src/fst/orthography/urucaps.xfscript
# THIS IS INCLUDED IN ALL.FST
# Uru + Cap normalisation
# #

echo <<< defining URUS >>>
define uruB b (->) B || .#. m _ ;
define uruC c (->) C || .#. g _ ;
define uruD d (->) D || .#. n _ ;
define uruF f (->) F || .#. b h _ ;
define uruG g (->) G || .#. n _ ;
define uruP p (->) P || .#. b _ ;
define uruS s (->) S || .#. t _ ;
define uruT t (->) T || .#. d _ ;
 
echo <<< defining VOWELPREFIXESS >>>

! t-aire can be tAire 
! therefore "-a" becomes "A" i.e %- a (->) A

define ntVowel %- a (->) A, %- e (->) E, %- i (->) I, %- o (->) O, %- u (->) U, 
%- á (->) Á, %- é (->) É, %- í (->) Í, %- ó (->) Ó, %- ú (->) Ú || .#. [n|t] _ ;

! can have le hÁine, na hÉireann etc.
define hVowel a (->) A, e (->) E, i (->) I, o (->) O, u (->) U, 
á (->) Á, é (->) É, í (->) Í, ó (->) Ó, ú (->) Ú || .#. h  _ ;

!push uruB
!push uruC
!push uruD
!push uruG
!push uruF
!push uruG
!push uruP
!push uruS
!push uruT
!push ntVowel
!push hVowel

!! NOW COMPOSED IN LOOKUP.SCRIPT

read regex uruB .o. uruC .o. uruD .o. uruG .o. uruF .o. uruG .o. uruP .o. uruS .o. uruT .o. ntVowel .o. hVowel ;
